Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1960.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA FAMILY RESILIENCY PARTNERSHIP.new text end new text begin $350,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $350,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for the Minnesota Family Resiliency Partnership under Minnesota Statutes, section 116L.96. The commissioner, through the adult career pathways program, shall distribute the funds to existing nonprofit and state displaced homemaker programs. These are onetime appropriations. new text end